Idaho, session 2025, H0120.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 54-5802, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-5802. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Apprentice" means a person registered with the barber and cosme-
tology services licensing board to learn an occupation in a licensed estab-
lishment who, while so learning, performs or assists in performing any prac-
tices of barbering, barber-styling, cosmetology, or electrology.
(2) "Barber" means a person licensed to practice barbering as defined
in this section.
(3) "Barbering" means any one (1) or any combination of the following
practices when performed on the upper part of the human body for cosmetic
purposes and not for the treatment of disease or physical or mental ailments:
(a) Shaving the face or cutting, trimming, arranging, dressing, curl-
ing, cleansing, singeing or performing similar work on the hair;
(b) Fitting, cutting or dressing hairpieces or toupees;
(c) Giving facial and scalp massages or treatments with oils, creams,
lotions or other preparations, either by hand or by a mechanical appli-
ance; and
(d) Applying cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, powders, oils, clays
or lotions to the scalp, face, and neck.
(4) "Barber-styling" means any one (1) or any combination of the fol-
lowing practices when performed on the upper part of the human body for cos-
metic purposes and not for the treatment of disease or physical or mental
ailments:
(a) Shaving the face or cutting, trimming, arranging, dressing, curl-
ing, waving by any method, straightening, cleansing, singeing, bleach-
ing, coloring or performing similar work on the hair;
(b) Fitting, cutting or dressing hairpieces or toupees;


(c) Giving facial and scalp massages or treatments with oils, creams,
lotions or other preparations, either by hand or by a mechanical appli-
ance; and
(d) Applying cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, powders, oils, clays
or lotions to the scalp, face, and neck.
(5) "Barber-stylist" means a person licensed to practice bar-
ber-styling as defined in this section.
(6) "Board" means the barber and cosmetology services licensing board
established by section 54-5806, Idaho Code.
(7) "Cosmetologist" means a person licensed to practice cosmetology as
defined in this section.
(8) "Cosmetology" means any one (1) or any combination of the following
practices when performed on the human body for cosmetic purposes and not for
the treatment of disease or physical or mental ailments:
(a) Cutting, trimming, arranging, dressing, curling, waving by any
method, cleansing, singeing, bleaching, coloring or performing similar
work on the hair, except as provided for in subsection (26) of this sec-
tion;
(b) Fitting, cutting or dressing hairpieces or toupees;
(c) Noninvasive care of the skin by application of cosmetic prepa-
rations, antiseptics, tonics, lotions, creams and essential oils
to cleanse, massage, exfoliate, hydrate and stimulate; makeup ap-
plication; pore extraction; use of chemical exfoliants approved for
professional esthetic use; particle exfoliation; use of any class I
medical device, as classified by the United States food and drug admin-
istration, designed for care of the skin, except that a class II medical
device designed for care of the skin may be used as directed and super-
vised by an authorized and licensed health care practitioner; temporary
removal of superfluous hair by lotions, creams, waxing, tweezing, de-
pilatories or other means; and tinting or perming the eyebrows and
eyelashes; and
(d) Manicuring and pedicuring nails and applying artificial nails.
(9) "Division" means the division of occupational and professional li-
censes.
(10) "Electrologist" means a person licensed to practice electrology,
as defined in this section, and skilled in the permanent removal of unwanted
hair.
(11) "Electrology" or "electrolysis" means the permanent removal of
hair by destroying the hair-producing cells of the skin and vascular system
through the use of equipment and devices approved by and registered with the
United States food and drug administration.
(12) "Establishment" means a place licensed under this chapter, other
than a licensed school, where barbering, barber-styling, cosmetology or
electrology is practiced.
(13) "Esthetician" means a person licensed to practice esthetics as de-
fined in this section.
(14) "Esthetics" means noninvasive care of the skin by application of
cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, tonics, lotions, creams and essential
oils to cleanse, massage, exfoliate, hydrate and stimulate; makeup applica-
tion; pore extraction; use of chemical exfoliants approved for professional


esthetic use; particle exfoliation; use of any class I medical device, as
classified by the United States food and drug administration, designed for
care of the skin, except that a class II medical device designed for care
of the skin may be used as directed and supervised by an authorized and li-
censed health care practitioner; temporary removal of superfluous hair by
lotions, creams, waxing, tweezing, depilatories or other means; and tinting
or perming the eyebrows and eyelashes.
(15) "Haircutting" means cutting, trimming, arranging, dressing, curl-
ing, cleansing, singeing or performing similar work on the hair and fitting,
cutting or dressing hairpieces or toupees.
(16) "Hairpieces or toupees" means a full or partial head covering that
is made from natural or synthetic hair that is affixed to a person's scalp,
hair, or head with an adhesive agent such as glue, tape, keratin bonds, fu-
sion bonds, or other bonding agent, and is worn during activities such as
sleep, exercise, and bathing.
(17) "High school student" means a person who has completed the first
two (2) years of high school and is enrolled in a high school or secondary
school licensed under this chapter.
(18) "Instructor" means a person licensed under this chapter to prac-
tice and teach any practice defined in this section.
(19) "Instructor trainee" means a barber, barber-stylist or cosmetol-
ogist attending a licensed school to receive training to teach barbering,
barber-styling or cosmetology.
(20) "Licensed school" means a secondary or postsecondary barber, cos-
metology, or electrology school that:
(a) Is licensed under its official name by the barber and cosmetology
services licensing board; and
(b) Admits as students only those individuals who meet the requirements
of section 54-5810(1)(b), Idaho Code.
(21) "Makeover or glamour photography business" means a business offer-
ing photographic services to the general public in which the business's em-
ployees apply cosmetic products to customers' faces or arrange the hair of
customers in connection with the sale or attempted sale of photographic ser-
vices.
(22) "Makeup artist" means a person certificated to practice makeup
artistry as defined in this section.
(23) "Makeup artistry" means noninvasive care of the skin by applica-
tion of cosmetic preparations for cleansing and the application of makeup,
which includes the application of cosmetics or any pigment product that is
used to cover, camouflage or decorate the skin.
(24) "Nail technician" means a person licensed to practice nail tech-
nology as defined in this section.
(25) "Nail technology" means any one (1) or more of the following prac-
tices when performed on the human body:
(a) Manicuring and pedicuring nails;
(b) Applying artificial nails; and
(c) Massaging the hands and feet.
(26) "Natural hair braiding" means the service of twisting, wrapping,
weaving, extending, locking, or braiding hair by hand or with a mechanical
device.


(a) "Natural hair braiding" includes:
(i) The use of natural or synthetic hair extensions, natural or
synthetic hair and fibers, and decorative beads and other hair ac-
cessories;
(ii) Minor trimming of natural hair or hair extensions incidental
to twisting, wrapping, weaving, extending, locking, or braiding
hair;
(iii) The making of wigs from natural hair, natural fibers, syn-
thetic fibers, and hair extensions; and
(iv) The use of topical agents, such as conditioners, gels,
moisturizers, oils, pomades, and shampoos, in conjunction with
performing services under subparagraphs (i) or (ii) of this para-
graph.
(b) "Natural hair braiding" does not include:
(i) The application of dyes, reactive chemicals, or other prepa-
rations to alter the color of the hair or to straighten, curl, or
alter the structure of the hair; or
(ii) The use of chemical hair joining agents, such as synthetic
tape, keratin bonds, or fusion bonds.
(27) "Retail cosmetics dealer" means a stationary business offering
cosmetic products for sale at retail to the general public in which the busi-
ness's employees apply cosmetic products to customers' faces in connection
with the sale or attempted sale of the products without compensation from the
customer other than the regular price of the products.
(28) "Retail thermal styling equipment dealer" means a retail business
that offers thermal styling equipment, such as curling irons, curling wands,
flat irons, heated hair rollers, blow-dryers or other devices using heat to
style hair, for sale at retail to members of the general public and whose em-
ployees engage in the limited use of thermal styling equipment on customers
in connection with the sale or attempted sale of the equipment without com-
pensation from the customer other than the regular price of the equipment.
(29) (28) "Student" means a person learning barbering, barber-styling,
cosmetology or electrology at a licensed school who, while so learning, per-
forms or assists in performing any practices of barbering, barber-styling,
cosmetology or electrology.
(30) (29) "Wig" means a removable head covering that is made from nat-
ural hair, natural fibers that resemble hair, or synthetic fibers that re-
semble hair. A wig is not affixed to a person's scalp or hair using an adhe-
sive agent such as glue, tape, keratin bonds, fusion bonds, or other bonding
agent.
SECTION 2. That Section 54-5805, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-5805. EXEMPTIONS FROM LICENSURE. The licensing, certification,
and registration provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the follow-
ing:
(1) Persons authorized by the laws of this state to practice as a nurse
or to practice any of the healing arts while in the proper discharge or dele-
gation of their professional duties.


(2) Persons who provide on-site personal care or hygiene services, in-
cluding shaving; trimming of hair, beard, or mustache; washing, brushing, or
combing hair; and basic skin care and nail care, to residents at facilities
licensed under the department of health and welfare, division of licensing
and certification.
(3) Persons practicing in their own home without compensation who are
not practicing on the public in general.
(4) Persons practicing on a relative without compensation.
(5) Persons whose practice is limited to the facial application of cos-
metic products to customers in connection with the sale or attempted sale of
cosmetic products on the premises of a retail cosmetics dealer without com-
pensation from the customer other than the price of the products.
(6) Persons whose practice is limited to the demonstration of thermal
styling equipment on customers in connection with the sale or attempted sale
of thermal styling equipment on the premises of a registered thermal styling
equipment dealer without compensation from the customer other than the price
of the equipment.
(7) Currently enrolled students or actively registered apprentices
practicing or demonstrating outside of a licensed school or establishment
when that practice or demonstration is under the direct supervision of a
licensed instructor. Members of the public may not be charged for any ser-
vices performed by a student or an apprentice practicing pursuant to this
subsection.
(8) Persons who are licensed or qualified through proper documentation
to practice or teach barbering, barber-styling or cosmetology in a state,
territory or possession of the United States or in a foreign country and
whose practice and activities are limited to education or demonstration
of no more than fourteen (14) consecutive days, provided that such persons
shall observe and comply with sanitation requirements established by rule.
Members of the public may not be charged for any services performed as part of
the demonstration or education.
(9) Persons who are employed, participating in, or contracted to per-
form barber-styling or cosmetology services in the course of and incidental
to the production of a theatrical or other visual arts production, including
but not limited to stage productions, television and motion pictures.
(10) Persons whose practice is limited to natural hair braiding as de-
fined in section 54-5802, Idaho Code.
(11) Persons or businesses selling, offering for sale, or fitting wigs
as defined in this chapter, as long as such persons or businesses do not use
adhesive agents such as glue, tape, keratin bonds, fusion bonds, or other
bonding agents to attach a hairpiece or toupee to a person's scalp, hair, or
head.
SECTION 3. That Section 54-5813, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 4. That Section 54-5818, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-5818. ESTABLISHMENTS -- INSPECTION RULES. Inspections for the
purpose of enforcing the provisions of this chapter shall be made by the


board. The board shall have authority to prescribe safety, disinfection and
sanitary requirements for barber and cosmetology establishments, retail
cosmetics dealers, retail thermal styling equipment dealers and barber and
cosmetology schools as such requirements apply to the nature of the work
performed. The officers of the board or its agents shall have authority
to enter and inspect at any time during business hours any barber or cos-
metology establishment, retail cosmetics dealer, retail thermal styling
equipment dealer, barber or cosmetology school, or other location where bar-
ber-styling or cosmetology services are being provided. A copy of the rules
adopted by the board shall be made available upon request by the board to
the owner or manager of each establishment, retail cosmetics dealer, retail
thermal styling equipment dealer, or school.
SECTION 5. That Section 54-5826, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-5826. CERTAIN ACTS PROHIBITED. The following acts shall be misde-
meanors:
(1) Violating a provision of this chapter;
(2) Permitting any person in one's employ, supervision or control to
practice barbering, barber-styling, cosmetology or electrology or to prac-
tice as an apprentice or student, if that person has not complied with the
provisions of this chapter;
(3) Obtaining or attempting to obtain a registration, certificate or
license for money other than the required fee or any other thing of value or
by fraudulent misrepresentation;
(4) Practicing or offering to practice any of the occupations defined
in this chapter, unless licensed, certificated or registered or otherwise
exempt as herein provided; and
(5) Maintaining or operating a barber or cosmetology establishment, a
retail cosmetics dealer facility, a retail thermal styling equipment dealer
facility, or a barber school or a cosmetology school, unless such facility is
licensed or registered as herein provided.
SECTION 6. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.